Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-1207
Department, defined.

Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 265;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 208;

Laws 2021, LB148, § 59;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 261.